src/scripts/Albanian/tok.foma
# SPDX-License-Identifier: GPL-3.0-or-later

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# Copyright (C) 2021 Non-Routine LLC.  <lp@louderpages.org>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, version 3.0 of the License.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Affero General PublicLicense for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# need to run with both latin and Cyrillic:

define TokenTypeTag num|dig|sym|word|lseq ; 
define SpecialSymbol TokenTypeTag | eos ; 

source alphabet.foma
source macedonian.foma

# ' is a vowel define Word [Letter+ [Apos Letter+]*] | ExceptionalWord ; 
#define Word [grapheme+] ; 
define Word [grapheme|MacGrapheme]+ ; 

define LetterSequence [ConsonantLetter|MacUCConsonant]+ - {Pst} - {pst}; 
#  The word B must not be named as a letter. However, its Latin equivalent, follwoed by a dot, is an abbev. ...

define NZDigit 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9;
define Digit %0|NZDigit;

define FormattedNumber NZDigit Digit^<3 [%. Digit^3]^{1,4} ; 
define Decimal  FormattedNumber %, Digit+;  # 0.1 2.0000
# foreign decimal of form 0.12, 0.1234 ...  but NOT 01.23
define ForeignDecimal  [[NZDigit Digit*] | %0] %. [Digit^{1,2} | Digit^>3];  # 0.1 2.0000

source romans.foma
source OrdinalSuffixes.foma
source abbrevs.foma 

source compound-words.foma
define BasicTokenizer  
Abbreviation @-> ... word || _   \[Letter|MacGrapheme|num|%.] | [ %. [\num|.#.]] | .#. ,,  
[Word (Apos)] @-> ... word || _   \[Letter|MacGrapheme|num|word|%.] | [ %. [\num|.#.]] | .#. ,,  # Roman Number might have been here first, so do not mess with labelled Num
[FormattedNumber (OrdSuffix)] @-> ... num || _ [.#. | \[Digit|Letter]]   ,, 
Decimal  @-> ... num || _ .#. | \Digit ,, 
ForeignDecimal  @-> ... num || _ .#. | \Digit ,, 
NZDigit Digit* OrdSuffix @-> ... num || _ [.#. | \[Digit|Letter|MacGrapheme]]   ,, 
NZDigit Digit* @-> ... num  ,, 
%0 Digit+ @-> ... dig ,, 
%0 @-> ... num ,, 
\[Letter | MacGrapheme | Digit | num | word] @-> ... sym  || _ [\num | .#.]   # again, protect Roman Numerals like V. with a dot 
; 

define UntagLargeNumbers 
num -> dig || Digit^16 _ ; 

define CamelCase 
ucLetter lcLetter* @-> ... word || [.#.|word|num|dig|sym] _ ucLetter lcLetter ; 

source acronyms.foma

define TagLetterSequences 
word -> lseq || [.#.|word|num|dig|sym] [Acronym | LetterSequence] _ [\Apos|.#.]; 

define TagLetterSequenceAbbreviations 
lseq -> word || [.#.|word|lseq|num|dig|sym] Abbreviation _ ; 

# retrieve decimals
define DecimalNumbers  
[num %, sym] -> %,  || .#. Digit+  _ Digit+ num .#. ;  # pass 12,34 as a number

define GeneralTokenizerIgnoringEoS 
# This will apply to the input separated from an optional eos symbol.
# We are letting Foma know that our special tags will never be in the input.
# This should make debugging non-functionality easier.
[[\SpecialSymbol]+] .o. 
[ RomanNumeral @-> ... num || .#. _ .#.  .o.  splitCompounds .o. BasicTokenizer ] 
 .o. 
DecimalNumbers  .o.
CamelCase .o.
TagLetterSequences .o. 
TagLetterSequenceAbbreviations .o. 
UntagLargeNumbers 
; 

# It's simpler to fix these afterwards, because otherwise it could be
#   very easy to break some existing code. Though it does unfortunately
#   mean writing an individual rule for each such exception and orring
#    them. Just one rule right now.
define NotBeforeEoSAbbreviation 
[[Z 0:lseq %. 0:sym]] 
 word:0 ; 

define FixIfEoS 
NotBeforeEoSAbbreviation -> || _ eos ; 

define GeneralTokenizer 
[GeneralTokenizerIgnoringEoS (eos)] 
.o. FixIfEoS 
.o. [eos -> 0] ; 

define SingleLetterException Letter [eos : lseq] ; 
define Exception SingleLetterException ; 

source Times.foma 
define retrieveHoursMinutes 
   Hours [[num|dig]:0] %: [sym:0] Minutes [[dig|num]:num] ->  || .#. _  .#. ;

define Tokenizer Exception .P. GeneralTokenizer .o. retrieveHoursMinutes; 

define TokenOfType(tag) [[[\[eos | TokenTypeTag]]+ (eos)] .o. Tokenizer .o. [[\TokenTypeTag]+ [tag:0]]].l ;
define NumberToken TokenOfType(num);
define WordToken TokenOfType(word);
define LSeqToken TokenOfType(lseq);

regex Tokenizer ; 
